tests/lin.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                                                         !!!
!!!                   L I N G A L A   T R A N S D U C E R                   !!!
!!!                                                                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>       ! Noun
%<adj%>     ! Adjective
%<prn%>     ! Pronoun
%<adv%>     ! Adverb
%<pr%>      ! Preposition
%<conn%>    ! Connective (various uses)
%<cnjcoo%>  ! Coordinating Conjunction
%<cnjsub%>  ! Subordinating Conjunction
%<vblex%>   ! Verb
%<ij%>      ! Interjection
%<foc%>     ! Focus marker

%<neg%>     ! Negative particle
%<num%>     ! Numeral

! Number morphology
%<pl%>      ! Plural
%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<sp%>      ! Singular or Plural

! Person morphology
%<p1%>      ! First person
%<p2%>      ! Second person
%<p3%>      ! Third person

! Gender morphology
%<m%>      ! Maculin
%<f%>      ! Feminine
%<mf%>      ! Masculine/Feminine
%<nt%>     ! Neutral

! Animacy morphology
%<aa%>      ! Animate
%<nn%>      ! Inanimate

! Verb tense and mood morphology
%<pres%>    ! Present tense
%<past%>    ! Unrelated distant past
%<urp%>     ! Unrelated recent past
%<dpres%>   ! Present grounded in the distant past
%<fut%>     ! Future tense
%<prs%>     ! Present subjunctive (Not currently in use)
%<fts%>     ! Future subjunctive (Not currently in use)
%<pis%>     ! Imperfect subjunctive (Not currently in use)
%<imp%>     ! Imperative
%<inf%>     ! Infinitive
%<vaux%>    ! Aux. Verb
%<intns%>   ! Intensifying (denotes certain for future/infinitive, insistence for imperative)

! Verb radical morphology
%<appl%>    ! Applicative
%<caus%>    ! Causative
%<recip%>   ! Reciprocal
%<pass%>    ! Passive
%<rev%>     ! Reversive
%<stat%>    ! Stative
%<contr%>   ! Contraction form (only used with kozala "to be") (Not currently in use)
%<refl%>    ! Reflexive

! Pronoun morpholgy
%<pers%>   ! Personal pronoun
%<dem%>    ! Demonstrative
%<pos%>    ! Possessive
%<rel%>    ! Relative pronoun
%<itg%>    ! Interrogative pronoun
%<ind%>    ! Indefinite
%<obj%>    ! Objective
%<subj%>   ! Subjective
%<ref%>    ! Reflective

%<det%>    ! Determiner
%<qnt%>    ! Quantifier

! Noun-specific morphology
%<abs%>     ! Abstract form of non-abstract noun
%<def%>     ! Definite plural
%<inst%>    ! Instantiated abstract noun
%<np%>      ! Proper noun
%<ant%>     ! Anthroponym
%<top%>     ! Toponym
%<al%>      ! Altres, misc proper nouns

! Noun-class morphology
%<cl1%>     ! Class 1 noun
%<cl1a%>    ! Class 1a noun (See Meeuwis, 2010)
%<cl3%>     ! Class 3 noun
%<cl5%>     ! Class 5 noun
%<cl7%>     ! Class 7 noun
%<cl9%>     ! Class 9 noun
%<cl11%>    ! Class 11 noun
%<cl14%>    ! Class 14 noun
%<cl15%>    ! Class 15 noun

! Numeral Categories
%<ord%> ! Ordinal
%<card%> ! Cardinal


%[%+sg%]   ! Singular (noun prefix matching)
%[%+pl%]   ! Plural (noun prefix matching)
%[%+abs%]  ! Abstract (derived from non-abstract)
%[%+def%]  ! Definite (used w. plural)
%[%+inst%] ! Instantiation of abstract concept

%[%+p1%]   ! First person
%[%+p2%]   ! Second person
%[%+p3%]   ! Third person
%[%+aa%]   ! Animate (used w. verb)
%[%+nn%]   ! Inanimate (used w. verb)
%[%+fut%]  ! Future tense
%[%+ref%]  ! Reflexive
%[%+inf%]  ! Infinitive
%[%+imp%]  ! Imperative

%[%-sg%]   ! Singular (noun prefix matching)
%[%-pl%]   ! Plural (noun prefix matching)
%[%-abs%]  ! Abstract (derived from non-abstract)
%[%-def%]  ! Definite (used w. plural)
%[%-inst%] ! Instantiation of abstract concept

%[%-p1%]   ! First person
%[%-p2%]   ! Second person
%[%-p3%]   ! Third person
%[%-aa%]   ! Animate (used w. verb)
%[%-nn%]   ! Inanimate (used w. verb)
%[%-fut%]  ! Future tense
%[%-ref%]  ! Reflexive
%[%-inf%]  ! Infinitive
%[%-imp%]  ! Imperative

%[%-cl1%]
!%[%-cl2%]
!%[%-cl3%]
!%[%-cl4%]
%[%-cl5%]
%[%-cl6%]
%[%-cl7%]
%[%-cl8%]
%[%-cl10%]

%[%+cl1%]
!%[%+cl2%]
!%[%+cl3%]
!%[%+cl4%]
%[%+cl5%]
%[%+cl6%]
%[%+cl7%]
%[%+cl8%]
%[%+cl10%]


%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side)
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side)
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side)
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side)

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%+      ! Compounding/incorporation lexical side
%-
%       ! Space
%{í%}   ! can be í or é (used with verb present tense suffix)
%{n%}   ! can be n or m (used for class 9 "prefix")



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
NounPrefix ;
ProperNouns ;
NoClassNouns ;
VerbPersonNum-Prefix ;
Pronouns ;
Determiner-Prefix;
Prepositions ;
Conjunctions ;
Connective ;
Adjective-Prefix ;
Adverb ;
YesNo ;
LoanWords ;
Tentative ;
Irregular ;
Punctuation ;
Numerals ;
Quantifiers ;
FocusMarkers ;
Interjections ;

LEXICON COMMON-Suffix
# ;

!=============================================================================!
!                         Noun Morphotactics                                  !
!=============================================================================!

LEXICON NounPrefix
I-II ;
Ia-II ;
III-IV ;
V-VI ;
VI-Only ;
VII-VIII ;
IX-X ;
XI-VI ;
XIV ;
XV ;
PrefixStacking-ABS ;
PrefixStacking-DEF ;
PrefixStacking-INST ;

LEXICON I-II
%[%-sg%]:mo%> I-II-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ba%> I-II-Stems ;

LEXICON Ia-II
%[%-sg%]: Ia-II-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ba%> Ia-II-Stems ;

LEXICON III-IV
%[%-sg%]:mo%> III-IV-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:mi%> III-IV-Stems ;

LEXICON V-VI
%[%-sg%]:li%> V-VI-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ma%> V-VI-Stems ;

LEXICON VI-Only
%[%-pl%]:ma%> VI-Only-Stems ;

LEXICON VII-VIII
%[%-sg%]:e%> VII-VIII-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:bi%> VII-VIII-Stems ;

LEXICON IX-X
IX-X-Invar ;
IX-X-Var ;
!%[%-sg%]: IX-X-Stems ;
!%[%-pl%]:ba%> IX-X-Stems ; ! (Meeuwis, 2010)
!%[%-sg%]:n%> IX-X-n-Stems ;
!%[%-sg%]:m%> IX-X-m-Stems ;
!%[%-pl%]:n%> IX-X-n-Stems ;
!%[%-pl%]:m%> IX-X-m-Stems ;

!!! Stems are either always prefaced by n/m or always not. Differentiated by lexicon structure
LEXICON IX-X-Invar
%[%-sg%]: IX-X-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ba%> IX-X-Stems ; ! (Meeuwis, 2010)
%[%-sg%]: IX-X-a-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ba%> IX-X-a-Stems ;

!!! Stems can be prefaced by n/m or not. Analyze both, generate with n/m.
LEXICON IX-X-Var
%[%-sg%]:%{n%} IX-X-b-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ba%>%{n%} IX-X-b-Stems ;
%[%-sg%]: IX-X-b-Stems ; ! Dir/LR
%[%-pl%]:ba%> IX-X-b-Stems ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON XI-VI
%[%-sg%]:lo%> XI-VI-Stems ;
%[%-pl%]:ma%> XI-VI-Stems ;

LEXICON XIV
%[%-sg%]:bo%> XIV-Stems ;

LEXICON XV
%[%-sg%]:ko%> XV-Stems ;

LEXICON PrefixStacking-ABS
%[%-abs%]:ki%> I-II ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> Ia-II ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> III-IV ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> V-VI ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> VII-VIII ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> IX-X ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> XI-VI ;
%[%-abs%]:ki%> XIV ;

LEXICON PrefixStacking-DEF
%[%-def%]:ba%> I-II ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> Ia-II ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> III-IV ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> V-VI ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> VII-VIII ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> IX-X ;
%[%-def%]:ba%> XI-VI ;

LEXICON PrefixStacking-INST
%[%-inst%]:ba%> XI-VI ;
%[%-inst%]:ba%> XIV ;

LEXICON I-II-Suffix
%[%+sg%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<sg%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<pl%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2
%[%+sg%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ;
%[%+pl%]%[%+abs%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<pl%>%<abs%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2
%[%+pl%]%[%+def%]%<n%>%<cl1%>%<pl%>%<def%>: COMMON-Suffix ; ! Technically class 2

LEXICON I-II-Stems
mobɛ́ti:bɛ́ti I-II-Suffix ; ! "Beater, drummer"
motúli:túli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Blacksmith"
motóngi:tóngi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Tailor, builder"
mokónzi:kónzi I-II-Suffix ; ! "King"
monanga:nanga I-II-Suffix ; ! "Chief"
moyékoli:yékoli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Disciple"
motíkí:tíkí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Heir"
molɔ́mí:lɔ́mí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Husband"
mosí:sí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Habitant"
mosémboli:sémboli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Just man"
mobekisi:bekisi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Judge, a just man"
mobáli:báli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Husband"
motɛ́kisi:tɛ́kisi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Merchant"
mobóti:bóti I-II-Suffix ; ! "Mother, person who gives birth"
mokilo:kilo I-II-Suffix ; ! "Mother-in-law"
mosɛnjí:sɛnjí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Native"
molúki:lúki I-II-Suffix ; ! "Paddler"
motómbí:tómbí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Porter"
mokangámí:kangámí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Prisoner"
mokuli:kuli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Receiver"
motómí:tómí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Sender"
mobateli:bateli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Guard, Protector"
mosáli:sáli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Labourer, worker"
monyalí:nyalí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Sister-in-law"
moómbó:ómbó I-II-Suffix ; ! "Slave"
motéyi:téyi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Preacher, teacher"
mojímbí:jímbí I-II-Suffix ; ! "Trickster"
moboma:boma I-II-Suffix ; ! "Victim"
molɔki:lɔki I-II-Suffix ; ! "Witch"
mobátísi:bátísi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Person who baptises"
mobíkisi:bíkisi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Savior"
mokambi:kambi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Chief, boss"
mokristo:kristo I-II-Suffix ; ! "A Christian"
molakisi:lakisi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Teacher"
molóni:lóni I-II-Suffix ; ! "Sower"
monguna:nguna I-II-Suffix ; ! "Enemy"
moníngá:níngá I-II-Suffix ; ! "Friend"
mopǎgánu:pǎgánu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Pangan"
mopaya:paya I-II-Suffix ; ! "Visitor"
mosántu:sántu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Saint"
moto:to I-II-Suffix ; ! "Person"
mɔ̌tɔ:tɔ I-II-Suffix ; ! Dir/LR
mutu:tu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Person"
moúmbu:úmbu I-II-Suffix ; ! "Slave"
moyémbi:yémbi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Singer"
moyíbi:yíbi I-II-Suffix ; ! "Thief"
moyángeli:yángeli I-II-Suffix ; ! "Governor"
molɔngɔ́:lɔngɔ́ I-II-Suffix ; ! "Line, genealogy"
mopiko:piko I-II-Suffix ; ! "Heap"
mondúle:ndúle I-II-Suffix ; ! "Music, sound"
